Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 15. Remote Recreational Cabin Site Sales and Leases.

Sec. 38.05.600.
Remote recreational cabin sites.

The commissioner may provide for the sale or lease of state land for remote recreational cabin sites. Sales under this section shall be at fair market value determined as of the time of entry, and the purchaser shall reimburse the state for the appraisal, survey, and platting costs for the recreational cabin site.

The annual fee for a remote recreational cabin site lease shall be set by the commissioner so as to ensure that the state receives a fair return for the use granted by the lease for the term of the lease. The commissioner shall establish regulations that specify the application procedures for and the terms and conditions of a remote recreational cabin site lease. A lease must be for a term of not more than five years, and may be renewed for one additional five-year period. At any time during the lease, the lessee may purchase the remote recreational cabin site by having the site appraised and surveyed in a manner acceptable to the department and by paying to the state the fair market value for the site determined as of the time of entry. The lease may not be assigned by the original lessee during the term of the lease.

A remote recreational cabin site lease may be terminated by the commissioner before the expiration of the term of the lease if a lessee fails to use the land under lease in the manner required by the terms of the lease. After termination of a remote recreational cabin site lease, improvements or personal property on the land subject to the lease shall be managed in the same manner as required by AS

38.05.090

.

History.

(§ 23 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.